New York, session 2025-2026, A192.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 45 of the correction law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 20 to read as follows: 3 20. Promulgate rules and regulations establishing standard practices 4 and procedures for the use of strip searches in correctional facilities. 5 Such rules and regulations shall at a minimum include a requirement that 6 no fewer than two staff members shall be present for any strip search. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 9 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 10 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 11 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00832-01-5